Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 6. General Provisions.

Sec. 18.66.900.
Definitions. [Repealed, § 72 ch 64 SLA 1996.]

Sec. 18.66.990.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“council” means the Council on Domestic Violence and Sexual Assault;

“crisis intervention and prevention program” means a community program that provides information, education, counseling, and referral services to individuals experiencing personal crisis related to domestic violence or sexual assault and to individuals in personal or professional transition, excluding correctional half-way houses, outpatient mental health programs, and drug or alcohol rehabilitation programs;

“domestic violence” and “crime involving domestic violence” mean one or more of the following offenses or an offense under a law or ordinance of another jurisdiction having elements similar to these offenses, or an attempt to commit the offense, by a household member against another household member:

a crime against the person under AS 11.41;

burglary under AS

11.46.300

—

11.46.310

;

criminal trespass under AS

11.46.320

—

11.46.330

;

arson or criminally negligent burning under AS

11.46.400

—

11.46.430

;

criminal mischief under AS

11.46.475

—

11.46.486

;

terrorist threatening under AS

11.56.807

or

11.56.810

;

violating a protective order under AS

11.56.740(a)(1)

;

harassment under AS

11.61.120(a)(2)

— (4); or

cruelty to animals under AS

11.61.140(a)(5)

if the animal is a pet;

“domestic violence program” means a program that provides services to the victims of domestic violence, their families, or perpetrators of domestic violence;

“household member” includes

adults or minors who are current or former spouses;

adults or minors who live together or who have lived together;

adults or minors who are dating or who have dated;

adults or minors who are engaged in or who have engaged in a sexual relationship;

adults or minors who are related to each other up to the fourth degree of consanguinity, whether of the whole or half blood or by adoption, computed under the rules of civil law;

adults or minors who are related or formerly related by marriage;

persons who have a child of the relationship; and

minor children of a person in a relationship that is described in (A) — (G) of this paragraph;

“judicial day” means any Monday through Friday that is not a state holiday and on which the court clerk’s offices are officially opened to receive legal documents for filing;

“local community entity” means a city or borough or other political subdivision of the state, a nonprofit organization, or a combination of these;

“pet” means a vertebrate living creature maintained for companionship or pleasure, but does not include dogs primarily owned for participation in a generally accepted mushing or pulling contest or practice or animals primarily owned for participation in rodeos or stock contests.

“petitioner” includes a person on whose behalf an emergency protective order has been requested under AS

18.66.110(b)

;

“sexual assault” means a crime specified in AS

11.41.410

—

11.41.450

;

“sexual assault program” means a program that provides services to the victims of sexual assault, their families, or perpetrators of sexual assault.

History.

(§ 33 ch 64 SLA 1996; am § 75 ch 21 SLA 2000; am § 20 ch 92 SLA 2002; am § 6 ch 87 SLA 2003; am §§
16, 17 ch 60 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

Paragraph (8) was enacted as (11); renumbered in 2016 to maintain alphabetical consistency at which time other paragraphs were also renumbered.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective January 17, 2017, added (3)(I), and made a related change; added (11) [now (8)].